Massachusetts, session 194th, H4750.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for a program of capital improvements to public higher
2 education institutions to provide support for these institutions in carrying out their educational
3 missions and to enhance regional economic development through their educational initiatives the
4 sums set forth in section 2 to 2B, inclusive, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions
5 specified in this act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the disbursement
6 of public funds, which sums shall be in addition to any other amounts previously appropriated
7 for these purposes.
8 SECTION 2.
9 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
10 Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance
1 of 25

11 7066-8001 For costs associated with deferred maintenance, modernization,
12 decarbonization and major capital projects, planning and studies, dispositions, acquisition of land
13 and buildings and interests therein by purchase or by eminent domain under chapter 79 and for
14 the preparation of plans and specifications, repairs, construction, renovations, improvements,
15 maintenance and repair, asset management and demolition at state university and community
16 college campus facilities and grounds; provided, that all projects approved for design and
17 construction by the division of capital asset management and maintenance shall be consistent in
18 priority and need with campus master plans developed by the division of capital asset
19 management and maintenance in consultation with the presidents of the state universities and
20 community colleges and approved by the secretary of education and the secretary of
21 administration and finance; provided further, that all maintenance and repair work funded by this
22 item shall be included in the capital asset management information system administered by the
23 division of capital asset management and maintenance; provided further, that costs payable from
24 this item shall include, but not be limited to, the costs of design, architecture and engineering,
25 and other services essential to these projects rendered by division of capital asset management
26 and maintenance employees or by consultants; and provided further, that amounts expended for
27 division employees may include the salary and salary-related expenses of these employees to the
28 extent that they work on or in support of these projects..........................................$1,250,000,000
29 7066-8002 For costs associated with plans and specifications, planning and studies,
30 dispositions, acquisition of land and buildings and interests therein by purchase or by eminent
31 domain under chapter 79, redevelopment, demolition, remediation, relocation and other capital
32 projects to support the transition of campus facilities and real property for purposes of housing
33 and mixed use development with the approval of the secretary of administration and finance, in
2 of 25

34 consultation with the secretaries of education and housing and livable communities; provided,
35 that funds from this item may be granted to the Massachusetts state college building authority
36 established in chapter 703 of the acts of 1963, as amended, for the purpose of supporting
37 adaptive reuse of state university and community college campus facilities for housing and
38 associated infrastructure with the approval of the secretary of administration and finance, in
39 consultation with the secretaries of education and housing and livable
40 communities………………………………………………………………………….$100,000,000
41 7066-8003 For costs associated with developing decarbonization plans for
42 Massachusetts public institutions of higher education and costs associated with decarbonization
43 and energy efficiency projects, including but not limited to preparation of plans and
44 specifications, electrification and replacement of fossil fuel-dependent campus and building
45 infrastructure, renovation of building envelopes to reduce energy consumption, purchase and
46 installation of energy efficiency or other capital equipment, and construction, reconstruction,
47 renovation, demolition and other improvements and retrofits to facilities including those
48 necessary for the installation and use of such equipment, and for decarbonization grants to public
49 institutions of higher education; provided, that all projects approved for design and construction
50 by the commissioner of the division of capital asset management and maintenance under this
51 item shall be consistent with approved decarbonization plans developed by the division of capital
52 asset management and maintenance…………………………….…………………….$80,000,000
53 7066-8004 For costs associated with: (i) laboratory modernization, furnishing,
54 equipping and related safety, ventilation, other associated renovations, rehabilitation,
55 construction and reconstruction to support laboratory modernization at public institutions of
56 higher education; (ii) repair, renovation, furnishing, construction, reconstruction, remediation,
3 of 25

57 modernization and equipping of facilities at Massachusetts community colleges and vocational
58 technical schools to support collaborations between Massachusetts community colleges and
59 vocational technical schools; provided, that funds for this purpose shall not exceed $10,000,000
60 for any 1 collaboration; and (iii) repair, renovation, furnishing, construction, reconstruction,
61 remediation, modernization and equipping of facilities to support student health, mental health,
62 wellness, accessibility, equity, safety, community engagement and other student support needs at
63 Massachusetts public higher education campuses; provided further, that not later than December
64 31, 2025, the secretary of administration and finance and the secretary of education shall jointly
65 submit an annual report to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the chairs of
66 the house and senate committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on
67 higher education detailing: (a) the number of stackable credentials earned by students across
68 collaborations between Massachusetts community colleges and vocational technical schools; (b)
69 the percentage of vocational technical school students utilizing programs or facilities at partner
70 Massachusetts community colleges; and (c) each project from initiation to completion, including
71 project phase, cost and anticipated completion date……………………….……….$120,000,000
72 7066-8005 For costs associated with developing campus master plans for
73 Massachusetts public institutions of higher education ..................................................$30,000,000
74 7066-8006 For costs associated with the revitalization of the Huntington Tower
75 Building at the Massachusetts College of Art and Design…………………………..$275,000,000
76 7100-1001 For costs associated with deferred maintenance, modernization,
77 decarbonization and major capital projects, planning and studies, dispositions, acquisition of land
78 and buildings and interests therein by purchase or by eminent domain under chapter 79, for the
4 of 25

79 preparation of plans and specifications, repairs, construction, renovations, improvements,
80 maintenance and repair, asset management and demolition at the University of Massachusetts
81 campus facilities and grounds; provided, that all projects approved for design and construction
82 by the division of capital asset management and maintenance shall be consistent in priority and
83 need with a campus master plan approved by the president of the University of Massachusetts
84 and the board of trustees of the University of Massachusetts; provided further, that all
85 maintenance and repair work funded by this item shall be included in the capital asset
86 management information system administered by the division of capital asset management and
87 maintenance; provided that costs payable from this item shall include, but not be limited to, the
88 costs of design, architecture and engineering and other services essential to these projects
89 rendered by division of capital asset management and maintenance employees or by consultants;
90 and provided further, that amounts expended for division employees may include the salary and
91 salary-related expenses of these employees to the extent that they work on or in support of these
92 projects…………………………………………….……………………………….$1,250,000,000
93 SECTION 2A.
94 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
95 Office of the Secretary
96 1100-2523 For a grant program to be administered by the executive office for
97 administration and finance, in consultation with the executive office of education, to provide
98 funding for repairs, construction, reconstruction, demolition, remediation, rehabilitation,
99 modernization, disposition, renovations, improvements and maintenance, decarbonization and
5 of 25

100 climate resilience upgrades and other related capital projects at Massachusetts public higher
101 education campuses…………………………………………………………………...$50,000,000
102 SECTION 2B.
103 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY
104 Office of the Secretary
105 1790-3019 For costs associated with technology capital projects and initiatives that
106 facilitate or enhance remote and hybrid learning opportunities and student support at
107 Massachusetts public higher education institutions, including but not limited to, the preparation
108 of plans and specifications, purchase, procurement, acquisition, licensing and implementation of
109 information technology, telecommunications and data-security-related equipment, hardware,
110 software, systems, including but not limited to, enterprise resource planning systems and
111 intellectual property and related projects approved by the secretary of technology services and
112 security in consultation with the secretary of administration and finance.....................$20,000,000
113 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
114 Office of the Secretary
115 7009-2009 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the executive
116 office of education, in consultation with the executive office of economic development and the
117 executive office of labor and workforce development, to provide funding for the purchase and
118 installation of equipment and related improvements and renovations to facilities necessary for the
119 installation and use of such equipment and to establish, upgrade and expand career technical
120 education and training programs that are aligned to regional economic and workforce
6 of 25

121 development priorities; provided, that grant applications may facilitate collaboration to provide
122 students enrolled in high schools with vocational and technical programs with postsecondary
123 opportunities consistent with those reported in clause (o) of the first paragraph of section 22 of
124 chapter 15A of the General Laws and section 37A of chapter 74 of the General
125 Laws.............................................................................................................................$100,000,000
126 SECTION 3. Section 5 of chapter 7C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
127 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the third sentence the following sentence:-
128 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the commissioner may delegate control and supervision over
129 projects involving structural or mechanical work with an estimated cost of less than $10,000,000
130 to the Massachusetts State College Building Authority if the commissioner determines that the
131 Massachusetts State College Building Authority has the ability to control and supervise such
132 project.
133 SECTION 4. Said chapter 7C is hereby further amended by inserting after section 34 the
134 following section:-
135 Section 34A. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context
136 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
137 “Public institution of higher education”, as defined in section 5 of chapter 15A.
138 (b)(1) Notwithstanding section 34, if the president of a public institution of higher
139 education determines, with the approval of the commissioner of higher education, that real
140 property of any such public institution of higher education is surplus to the current and
141 foreseeable needs of the public institution of higher education, the commissioner may dispose of
142 such property permanently or temporarily pursuant to this section; provided, however, that the
7 of 25

143 public institution of higher education’s board of trustees may disapprove such determination
144 within 60 days after the president’s determination.
145 (2) Any disposition pursuant to paragraph 1 shall be subject to section 36.
146 (c) If the commissioner determines that a property is surplus to the current and
147 foreseeable needs of a public institution of higher education, the commissioner shall provide
148 written notice, for each city or town in which the property is located, to: (i) the city manager in
149 the case of a city under Plan E form of government, the mayor and city council in the case of all
150 other cities or the chair of the board of selectmen or the select board in the case of a town; (ii) the
151 county commissioners, where applicable; (iii) the regional planning agency; and (iv) the
152 members of the general court who represent the city or town where property is located. The
153 commissioner shall set forth in each notice a description of the property and a declaration that the
154 property is surplus to the current or foreseeable needs of the public institution of higher
155 education.
156 (d)(1) If the commissioner determines that the property is surplus to the current and
157 foreseeable needs of such institution and that the property should be disposed of, either
158 temporarily or permanently, the commissioner shall declare that the property is available for
159 disposition and shall determine appropriate reuse restrictions.
160 (2) The commissioner shall ensure that any rental agreement, or in the case of a
161 conveyance a deed or separate disposition agreement as deemed appropriate by the
162 commissioner, sets forth the reuse restrictions provided for in paragraph (1). Said agreements
163 shall provide: (i) for effective remedies on behalf of the commonwealth, including, if deemed
164 appropriate by the commissioner, that title to the property or such lesser interest as is the subject
8 of 25

165 of the disposition agreement shall revert to the commonwealth in the event of a violation of any
166 such reuse restriction; and (ii) in the case of a disposition to a public agency for a direct public
167 use, that the title to the property or such lesser interest as is the subject of the disposition
168 agreement shall revert to the commonwealth in the event the property is no longer utilized for
169 such direct public use.
170 (3)(A) In determining reuse restrictions, the commissioner shall comply with all
171 restrictions pertaining to the property which may have been mandated by the general court and
172 may adopt additional restrictions, taking account of established state and local plans and policies.
173 (B) The commissioner shall conduct a public hearing to consider reuse restrictions if the
174 property exceeds 2 acres or if the gross square footage of all structures on the property is greater
175 than or equal to 150,000 square feet or if the commissioner determines that a hearing should be
176 held for a smaller parcel. Notice of the public hearing shall be: (i) placed at least once each week
177 for 4 consecutive weeks preceding the hearing in newspapers with sufficient circulation to
178 inform the people of the affected locality; (ii) posted on the department’s website; and (iii)
179 published in the central register pursuant to section 20A of chapter 9. The hearing shall be held
180 in the locality in which the property is located not sooner than 30 days and not later than 35 days
181 after notice thereof is published in the central register. After the hearing is conducted, the
182 commissioner shall make a draft of any reuse restrictions available to the public and shall accept
183 written comments for a period of 21 days. If after the hearing is conducted the commissioner
184 determines that no reuse restrictions are necessary, the commissioner shall make that decision
185 available to the public and accept written comments on that decision for a period of 21 days.
9 of 25

186 (e) The commissioner shall establish the value of the property, through procedures
187 customarily accepted by the appraising profession as valid for determining property value, for
188 both the highest and best use of the property as currently encumbered and under the reuse
189 restrictions as determined pursuant to this section. The commissioner shall submit any appraisal
190 to the inspector general for review and comment. The inspector general shall review and approve
191 the appraisal and the review shall include an examination of the methodology utilized for the
192 appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare and file a report with the commissioner. The
193 commissioner shall submit copies of the appraisal and the inspector general’s review and
194 approval and comments, if any, to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
195 joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight not less than 15 days prior to the
196 execution of documents effecting a disposition.
197 (f) No agreement for the rental or other disposition of state-owned real property disposed
198 of pursuant to this section, and no deed, executed by or on behalf of the commonwealth, shall be
199 valid unless such agreement or deed contains the following declaration, signed by the
200 commissioner:
201 The undersigned certifies under penalties of perjury that I have fully complied with
202 sections 34A and 36 of chapter 7C of the General Laws in connection with the property
203 described herein.
204 (g) The proceeds realized from the disposition of real property pursuant to this section
205 shall be deposited into the Higher Education Property Disposition Fund established pursuant to
206 section 2MMMMMM of chapter 29.
10 of 25

207 SECTION 5. Section 59 of said chapter 7C, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
208 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 18 to 20, inclusive, the words “No provider of design
209 services for any building project for which a state agency is the using agency shall be selected by
210 the designer selection board or by the administering agency and” and inserting in place thereof
211 the following words:- For any building project with an estimated construction cost greater than
212 $500,000.
213 SECTION 6. Said chapter 7C is hereby further amended by adding the following
214 section:-
215 Section 74. (a) Annually, not later than December 31, the commissioner and the secretary
216 of administration and finance, in consultation with the president of the University of
217 Massachusetts, the presidents of the state universities, the presidents of the community colleges,
218 the University of Massachusetts Building Authority and the Massachusetts State College
219 Building Authority, shall jointly submit a comprehensive report on capital expenditures for
220 public higher education to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the chairs of
221 the house and senate committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on
222 higher education.
223 (b)(1) The report shall include an executive summary synthesizing capital investments,
224 outcomes and system-wide trends across items 7066-8001, 7066-8004 and 7100-1001.
225 (2) The executive summary shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) total capital
226 expenditures by institution type and project category; (ii) system-wide progress toward
227 decarbonization, deferred maintenance reduction and programmatic modernization, including
228 comparative cost and timeline analysis with key contextual factors; (iii) identification of cross-
11 of 25

229 institutional best practices and recommendations for improving capital project delivery
230 efficiency and coordination; and (iv) a system-wide forecast of capital needs and funding gaps.
231 (c) The report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) a list of public institutions of
232 higher education and capital facility projects receiving funds; (ii) the associated amounts
233 committed and expended for each project; (iii) a categorization of each project by primary
234 purpose, including decarbonization, programmatic improvements or deferred maintenance, such
235 as critical repairs to campus or building infrastructure; (iv) a summary of how campus master
236 plan priorities informed the annual project selection process, including any deviations from
237 stated priorities and the rationale for such deviations; (v) an annual statement of cash inflows and
238 outflows detailing the sources and uses of funds; (vi) the cumulative amount of funds committed
239 versus expended; (vii) a forecast of future expenditures based on committed projects; (viii) a
240 detailed breakdown of costs charged including design, architecture, engineering and consultant
241 services, division of capital asset management and maintenance employee salary and salary-
242 related expenses and other administrative costs; (ix) a status report tracking each project from
243 initiation to completion, including project phase, anticipated completion date and confirmation
244 that maintenance and repair work has been entered into the capital asset management
245 information system; and (x) outcome metrics for completed projects, including, but not limited
246 to: (A) square footage constructed, renovated or demolished; (B) estimated annual emissions
247 reductions measured in metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent; (C) the dollar value of deferred
248 maintenance addressed; and (D) for land or building acquisitions, the purpose and strategic value
249 of the acquisition relative to institutional master planning goals.
250 SECTION 7. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
251 section 5B the following section:-
12 of 25

252 Section 5C. (a) Notwithstanding section 5, private nonprofit intuitions of higher
253 education in the commonwealth with a federal minority serving institution designation and
254 Quincy College, a municipal college and department within the city of Quincy, shall be part of
255 the community college segment established in section 5 for purposes of programs offered by the
256 department, including, but not limited to, the supporting urgent community college equity
257 through student success program and the community college program offered pursuant to section
258 5B.
259 (b) The department may promulgate regulations for implementation of this section.
260 SECTION 8. Subsection (a) of section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as
261 amended by section 18 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting
262 before the definition of “Dedicated transportation income surtax revenue amount” the following
263 definition:-
264 “Dedicated higher education income surtax revenue amount”, the amount of
265 $100,000,000 for each fiscal year.
266 SECTION 9. Said section 2BBBBBB of said chapter 29, as so amended, is hereby further
267 amended by striking out subsections (f) and (g) and inserting in place thereof the following 4
268 subsections:-
269 (f)(1) When authorized by a vote taken by the yeas and nays of two-thirds of each house
270 of the general court present and voting on such authorization, including any authorization in
271 effect as of July 1, 2025, the state treasurer, upon the request of the governor, may issue bonds of
272 the commonwealth as hereinafter provided. Any such bonds shall be special obligations of the
273 commonwealth payable solely from monies credited to the Education and Transportation Fund;
13 of 25

274 provided, however, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including,
275 but not limited to, section 60A, such bonds shall not be general obligations of the
276 commonwealth; and provided further, that debt service on said bonds shall not be greater than
277 the dedicated higher education income surtax revenue amount.
278 (2) Bonds may be issued pursuant to paragraph (1) in such manner and on such terms and
279 conditions as the state treasurer may determine in accordance with this paragraph and, to the
280 extent not inconsistent with this paragraph, the General Laws for the issuance of bonds of the
281 commonwealth. Bonds may be secured by a trust agreement entered into by the state treasurer,
282 with the concurrence of the secretary of administration and finance, on behalf of the
283 commonwealth, which trust agreement may pledge or assign all or any part of monies credited to
284 the Education and Transportation Fund and accounts within the Fund and rights to receive the
285 same, whether existing or coming into existence and whether held or thereafter acquired, and the
286 proceeds thereof. The state treasurer may, with the concurrence of the secretary of administration
287 and finance, enter into additional security, insurance or other forms of credit enhancement which
288 may be secured on a parity or subordinate basis with the bonds. A pledge in any such trust
289 agreement or credit enhancement agreement shall be valid and binding from the time such pledge
290 shall be made without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be
291 valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise,
292 whether such parties have notice thereof or not. Any such pledge shall be perfected by filing of
293 the trust agreement or credit enhancement agreement in the records of the state treasurer and no
294 filing need be made under chapter 106. Any such trust agreement or credit enhancement
295 agreement may establish provisions defining defaults and establishing remedies and other
296 matters relating to the rights and security of the holders of the bonds or other secured parties as
14 of 25

297 determined by the state treasurer, including provisions relating to the establishment of reserves,
298 the issuance of additional or refunding bonds, whether or not secured on a parity basis, the
299 application of receipts, monies or funds pledged pursuant to such agreement, the regulation of
300 the custody, investment and application of monies and such other matters deemed necessary or
301 desirable by the state treasurer for the security of such bonds. Any such bonds shall be deemed to
302 be investment securities under chapter 106, securities in which any public officer, fiduciary,
303 insurance company, financial institution or investment company may properly invest funds and
304 securities which may be deposited with any public custodian for any purpose for which the
305 deposit of bonds is authorized by law. Any such bonds, the transfer of such bonds and the
306 income from such bonds, including profit on the sale of such bonds, shall at all times be exempt
307 from taxation by and within the commonwealth.
308 (3) The provisions of this section relating to bonds shall also be applicable to the issuance
309 of notes insofar as such provisions may be appropriate for such notes.
310 (4) In order to increase the marketability of any such bonds or notes issued by the
311 commonwealth pursuant to this section and in consideration of the acceptance of payment for
312 any such bonds or notes, the commonwealth covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent
313 holders and transferees of any such bonds or notes that while any such bond or note shall remain
314 outstanding, and so long as the principal of or interest on any such bond or note shall remain
315 unpaid: (i) no pledged funds shall be diverted from the Education and Transportation Fund or
316 from any account within the Fund; (ii) in any fiscal year of the commonwealth and until an
317 appropriation has been made which is sufficient to pay the principal, including sinking fund
318 payments, of and interest on all such bonds and notes of the commonwealth and to provide for or
319 maintain any reserves, additional security, insurance or other forms of credit enhancement
15 of 25

320 required or provided for in any trust agreement securing any such bonds or notes, no pledged
321 funds shall be applied to any other use; and (iii) so long as such revenues are necessary, as
322 determined by the state treasurer in accordance with any applicable trust agreement or credit
323 enhancement agreement, for the purposes for which they have been pledged, and
324 notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the rates of the excise imposed in
325 subsection (d) of said section 4 of chapter 62 shall not be reduced below the amount in effect at
326 the time of issuance of any such bond or note.
327 (g) The annual spending threshold shall be equal to the prior year spending threshold, less
328 the dedicated transportation income surtax revenue amount and the dedicated higher education
329 income surtax revenue amount, plus an adjustment factor equal to the 10-year rolling rate of
330 growth of income subject to the tax specified in subsection (d) of section 4 of chapter 62 as
331 certified by the commissioner of revenue. For years in which the tax specified in said subsection
332 (d) of said section 4 of said chapter 62 was not in effect, the commissioner shall calculate the
333 amount of income that would have been subject to the taxes, adjusted for increases in the cost of
334 living in the same manner as described in Article XLIV of the Amendments to the Constitution
335 of the Commonwealth and set forth pursuant to said subsection (d) of said section 4 of said
336 chapter 62. Debt obligations secured by a trust established under subsection (f) shall not be
337 subject to the annual spending threshold.
338 (h) Any expenditures authorized from the fund shall be subject to sections 9B and 9C,
339 without respect to whether such purposes would otherwise be subject to allotment; provided,
340 however, that section 9C shall only apply where the amount of certified revenue in any fiscal
341 year is less than the annual spending threshold established under subsection (g).
16 of 25

342 (i) Annually, in consultation with the secretary of administration and finance, as part of
343 the annual statutory basis financial report required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of
344 section 12 of chapter 7A, the comptroller shall certify the amount of funds expended in the prior
345 fiscal year from the fund and designate each expenditure as transportation or education on the
346 basis of the department or purpose for which the expenditures were authorized.
347 SECTION 10. Said chapter 29 is hereby further amended by striking out section
348 2DDDDDD, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the
349 following section:-
350 Section 2DDDDDD. (a) There shall be an account within the Education and
351 Transportation Fund, established in section 2BBBBBB, known as the Education and
352 Transportation Innovation and Capital Account. The account shall be credited with: (i) funds
353 transferred pursuant to subsection (c) of section 2BBBBBB; (ii) appropriations or other money
354 authorized or transferred by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the
355 account; (iii) funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants
356 and donations; and (iv) any interest earned on the assets of the account.
357 (b) Amounts credited to the account may be expended, subject to appropriation, on 1-
358 time investments, including, but not limited to, pay-go capital or other 1-time projects, related to
359 quality public education and affordable public colleges and universities and for the repair and
360 maintenance of roads, bridges, public transit and rail equipment and facilities, culverts, bicycle
361 and pedestrian infrastructure such as paths, trails, sideways, walkways and other public ways and
362 similar public transportation infrastructure. Amounts credited to the account shall be made
363 available for expenditure upon their certification pursuant to section 5I. The account shall not be
17 of 25

364 subject to section 5C. Amounts in the account shall be available to pay any debt obligations
365 secured by a trust established under section 2BBBBBB.
366 (c) The comptroller shall certify the balance of the account at the end of each fiscal year.
367 SECTION 11. Said chapter 29 is hereby further amended by inserting after section
368 2LLLLLL, inserted by section 18 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025, the following section:-
369 Section 2MMMMMM. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
370 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Higher Education
371 Property Disposition Fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner of the division of
372 capital asset management and maintenance. The fund shall be credited with: (i) the proceeds
373 realized from the disposition of real property pursuant to section 34A of chapter 7C; (ii) any
374 appropriation, grant, gift or other contribution made to the fund; and (iii) any interest earned on
375 money in the fund.
376 (b) Amounts credited to the fund may be expended, without further appropriation, for
377 capital facility projects at public institutions of higher education, as set forth in section 5 of
378 chapter 15A, that address: (i) decarbonization; (ii) deferred maintenance; and (iii) critical repairs
379 to campus or building infrastructure, including, but not limited to, accessibility. Funds may also
380 be expended for capital facility projects that involve programmatic improvements funded
381 through other sources; provided, that the funds shall be used for the purposes described in this
382 subsection. The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available
383 for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the
384 fund to be in deficit at any point.
18 of 25

385 (c) Annually, not later than December 31, the commissioner of the division of capital
386 asset management and maintenance shall submit a report to the clerks of the house of
387 representatives and the senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means
388 and the chairs of the joint committee on higher education. The annual report shall include, but
389 shall not be limited to: (i) a list of the public institutions of higher education, as set forth in
390 section 5 of chapter 15A, and the capital facility projects receiving funds; (ii) the associated
391 amounts committed and expended for each project; (iii) a categorization of each project by
392 primary purpose, including decarbonization, deferred maintenance, critical repairs to campus or
393 building infrastructure or programmatic improvements; (iv) a status report tracking each project
394 from initiation to completion, including project phase and anticipated completion date; and (v)
395 outcome metrics for completed projects, including, but not limited to: (A) square footage
396 renovated; (B) estimated annual emissions reductions measured in metric tons of carbon dioxide
397 equivalent; (C) the dollar value of deferred maintenance addressed; and (D) the number and type
398 of accessibility barriers removed.
399 SECTION 12. Section 1 of chapter 703 of the acts of 1963, as most recently amended by
400 section 121 of chapter 68 of the acts of 2011, is hereby further amended by striking out
401 paragraph (e) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
402 (e) “Project”, the construction of new buildings or structures and the acquisition, addition
403 to, alteration, enlargement, reconstruction, rehabilitation, remodeling and other work, including,
404 but not limited to, the alteration or modification, of existing facilities or the construction of
405 additional or new facilities required or authorized by changes in or enactments of new law or
406 regulation or changes in or new circumstances such as, provision for access or use by persons
407 with a disability, provision for conservation of energy, provision for safety and security of
19 of 25

408 persons and property, provision for other compliance with changed or new law, regulation or
409 circumstance, in or upon or respecting existing buildings or structures, the provision and
410 installation therein or in respect thereof of furnishings, furniture, machinery, equipment,
411 facilities, approaches, driveways, walkways, parking areas, planting and landscaping, the
412 acquisition of land, other property, rights, easements and interests acquired for or in respect to
413 any thereof, the demolition or removal of any buildings or structures, including buildings or
414 structures owned by the commonwealth, on land so acquired or interests in which are so acquired
415 and site preparation, with respect to which the Authority shall provide by resolution for the
416 issuance of a series of bonds or notes; provided, however, that the term project shall also include
417 the control and supervision of a building project delegated to the Authority by the commissioner
418 of capital asset management and maintenance pursuant to section 5 of chapter 7C of the General
419 Laws. Whenever appropriate the word shall also mean such land, buildings or structures and
420 such appurtenances.
421 SECTION 13. Section 2 of said chapter 703, as most recently amended by section 6 of
422 chapter 258 of the acts of 2008, is hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph
423 and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
424 The Authority shall consist of the following 11 members: 9 members appointed by the
425 governor, of whom 3 members shall be appointive members of the trustees and shall be
426 graduates of a state college or university; 1 member, who shall serve as a non-voting member,
427 appointed by the council of presidents of the Massachusetts state university system who shall be
428 a president of a Massachusetts state university or a designee; and 1 member, who shall serve as a
429 non-voting member, appointed by the Massachusetts association of community colleges who
430 shall be a president of a Massachusetts community college or a designee. The members
20 of 25

431 appointed from the appointive members of the trustees shall continue in office so long as they
432 continue in office as trustees, and such dual membership shall not invalidate any action
433 heretofore or hereafter taken by the Authority or by the trustees in which such a member of the
434 Authority holding such dual membership has participated or may participate. Each member
435 appointed other than from the appointive members of the trustees shall continue in office for a
436 term expiring on June thirtieth in the sixth calendar year next after the calendar year in which the
437 term of office of such member began, except that a person appointed to fill a vacancy in any such
438 membership shall serve only for the unexpired term. Each member shall continue in office until
439 the successor of such member shall have been appointed and qualified, but the term of office of a
440 member appointed other than from the appointive members of the trustees shall be deemed to
441 have commenced in the calendar year in which the stated term of office of the predecessor of
442 such member shall have expired. Any member of the Authority may be removed by the governor
443 for cause after notice and a public hearing unless such notice and hearing are expressly waived in
444 writing. The Authority shall annually elect from its members a chair and a vice-chair. The
445 Authority shall elect a secretary-treasurer and may elect an assistant secretary-treasurer who need
446 not be members of the Authority. Members who serve as non-voting members shall have the
447 right to be present at any meeting or matter relating to official business of the Authority and the
448 right to receive all information, reports, studies and other relevant information that voting
449 members are entitled to receive.
450 SECTION 14. Section 3 of said chapter 703, as most recently amended by section 122 of
451 chapter 68 of the acts of 2011, is hereby further amended by striking out the first and second
452 sentences and inserting in place thereof the following 2 sentences:-
21 of 25

453 The Authority is created for the general purposes of aiding and contributing to the
454 performance of the educational and other purposes of the state universities and community
455 colleges by providing academic and administrative facilities, campus infrastructure,
456 improvements related to energy efficiency and decarbonization, dormitories, dining commons
457 and other buildings, structures and facilities designed primarily for housing, feeding, medical
458 care, parking, athletics and cultural and extracurricular and other student life activities and
459 services primarily: (i) for the use of 1 or more state universities or community colleges, students,
460 staff and their dependents; (ii) for lease to or use by an organization or association, in any form,
461 of students or others the activities of which are a part of the activities at 1 or more state
462 universities or community colleges and subject to regulation by the trustees; or (iii) for lease to
463 or use by any other entity the activities of which are approved by the trustees as furthering the
464 purposes of 1 or more of the state universities or community colleges, any of the foregoing of
465 which may be located at such places as the trustees may designate and may be provided in
466 collaboration with, and for joint use by, other agencies, boards, commissions or departments and
467 authorities created by the laws of the commonwealth; provided, however, that the Authority shall
468 not provide housing facilities at community colleges unless the board of higher education
469 authorizes the action. The Authority shall not initiate any project except upon written request
470 made by authority of the trustees and upon written approval from the secretary of administration
471 and finance and the secretary of education. Any project initiated by the Authority shall be
472 consistent with the campus master plan for the state university or community college.
473 SECTION 15. (a) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act, the secretary
474 of administration and finance and the commissioner of the division of capital asset management
475 and maintenance, in consultation with the president of the University of Massachusetts, the
22 of 25

476 presidents of the state universities and the presidents of the community colleges, shall submit a
477 report to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the chairs of the house and
478 senate committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on higher education
479 for each public institution of higher education identifying any deferred maintenance projects at
480 the University of Massachusetts, the state universities or the community colleges, the estimated
481 cost of which exceeds $50,000,000. The report shall include a roadmap on how to address
482 necessary projects and timelines for repairs over the next 5 years.
483 (b) For each such project, the secretary of administration and finance and the
484 commissioner of the division of capital asset management and maintenance shall submit in its
485 report the proposed plan to repair, refurbish or otherwise address the deferred maintenance
486 project. The report shall contain for each project the following: (i) a plan to undertake the
487 project; (ii) the total estimated cost of the project; (iii) a detailed breakdown of costs, including
488 expenditures for design, architectural, engineering and consultant services; and (iv) a project
489 timeline identifying major milestones from initiation through completion.
490 SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the
491 expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2, the state treasurer shall, upon request of the
492 governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to be specified by the
493 governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate, $3,105,000,000. All bonds
494 issued by the commonwealth as aforesaid shall be designated on their face, Public Higher
495 Education Capital Expenditure Act of 2025, and shall be issued for a maximum term of years,
496 not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general court under section 3 of
497 Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution. The bonds shall be payable not later than
498 June 30, 2070. All interest and payments on account of principal on these obligations shall be
23 of 25

499 payable from the Education and Transportation Fund. Bonds and interest on bonds issued under
500 this section shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, be special obligations of the
501 commonwealth. Such bonds shall not be included in the computation of outstanding bonds for
502 purposes of the limit imposed by the second paragraph of section 60A of chapter 29 of the
503 General Laws, nor shall debt service with respect to such bonds be included in the computation
504 of the limit imposed by section 60B of said chapter 29.
505 SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to meet the
506 expenditures necessary in carrying out sections 2A and 2B, the state treasurer shall, upon request
507 of the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an amount to be specified by the
508 governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate $170,000,000. All bonds issued
509 by the commonwealth as aforesaid shall be designated on their face, Public Higher Education
510 Capital Expenditure Act of 2025, and shall be issued for a maximum term of years, not
511 exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general court under section 3 of
512 Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution. The bonds shall be payable not later than
513 June 30, 2070. All interest and payments on account of principal on these obligations shall be
514 payable from the Education and Transportation Fund. Bonds and interest on bonds issued under
515 this section shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, be special obligations of the
516 commonwealth. Such bonds shall not be included in the computation of outstanding bonds for
517 purposes of the limit imposed by the second paragraph of section 60A of chapter 29 of the
518 General Laws, nor shall debt service with respect to such bonds be included in the computation
519 of the limit imposed by section 60B of said chapter 29.
24 of 25

520 SECTION 18. Not later than March 1, 2027, the commissioner of capital asset
521 management and maintenance shall submit the first report required pursuant to section 74 of
522 chapter 7C of the General Laws, inserted by section 6.
25 of 25